Massachusetts, session 194th, H3983.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 29 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting, after
section 2JJJJJJ, the following section:-
Section 2KKKKKK. (a) There shall be established and set up on the books of the
commonwealth a separate fund known as the Emerging Technologies Workforce Training Trust
Fund, hereinafter referred to as the fund. The fund shall be administered by the department of
career services established in section 1 of chapter 23H in collaboration with the Commonwealth
Corporation Foundation.
(b) The fund shall be credited with: (i) revenue from appropriations or other money
authorized by the general court and specifically designated to be credited to the fund; (ii) interest
earned on money in the fund; (iii) contributions from private sector entities, including technology
firms, foundations and other organizations; and (iv) federal grants and other gifts, grants and
donations for the establishment and expansion of workforce training programs, including
of 3

programs in blockchain, artificial intelligence, cybersecurity and renewable energy technologies.
Amounts credited to the fund shall not be subject to further appropriation and any money
remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not revert to the General Fund.
(c) The Commonwealth Corporation Foundation, in consultation with the department of
career services, shall make expenditures from the fund for the following purposes:
(i) providing grants to institutions of higher education, vocational technical schools and
workforce training organizations for the development and implementation of training programs
in blockchain, artificial intelligence, cybersecurity and renewable energy technologies;
(ii) sponsoring scholarships, paid internships and award programs to support individuals
pursuing careers in blockchain, artificial intelligence, cybersecurity and renewable energy
technologies with a focus on individuals from underrepresented populations;
(iii) partnering with private companies to create work-based learning opportunities,
including apprenticeships and on-the-job training;
(iv) funding public awareness campaigns to promote careers in emerging technologies
and available training opportunities;
(v) developing regional workforce strategies in collaboration with regional employment
boards to address specific labor market needs; and
(vi) partnering with technology firms in the commonwealth to reduce state funding
burdens and demonstrate industry buy-in.
(d) The Commonwealth Corporation Foundation shall prepare an annual report on the
activity of the fund that shall include: (i) the number and type of grants awarded; (ii) the number
of 3

of participants trained and employed as a result of the fund’s programs; (iii) the amount of
private sector contributions leveraged; and (iv) any recommendations for improvements to the
fund’s programs. The annual report shall be submitted, not later than December 31, to the: chairs
of the joint committee on advanced information technology, the internet and
cybersecurity; chairs of the joint committee on labor and workforce development; house and
senate committees on ways and means; and clerks of the house of representatives and senate
(e) The annual report shall be published on the Commonwealth Corporation Foundation’s
website and distributed to stakeholders.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2026.
of 3